Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2431YH (2) 91 ll/ns H.F. 459 Section 1. Section 123.10, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Regulating the purchase of alcoholic liquor generally 3 and the furnishing of the liquor to class âEâ retail alcohol 4 licensees under this chapter , and determining the classes, 5 varieties, and brands of alcoholic liquors to be kept in state 6 warehouses. However, the director shall not delist a native 7 distilleryâs native distilled spirits based solely on a failure 8 to meet sales guidelines once the director determines to list 9 the native distilleryâs native distilled spirits. 10